Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2013.02
Scrap tire or waste tire, defined.

Scrap tire or waste tire means a tire that is no longer suitable for its original intended purpose because of wear, damage, or defect.

Laws 2003, LB 143, § 4.